North Carolina, session 2025, HB1192.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. FUEL COST SHARING
SECTION 1. G.S. 62-133.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 62-133.2. Fuel and fuel-related charge adjustments for electric utilities.
(a) The Commission shall permit anAn electric public utility that generates electric power
by fossil fuel or nuclear fuel shall request Commission approval to charge an increment or
decrement as a rider to its rates for changes in the cost of fuel and fuel-related costs used in
providing its North Carolina customers with electricity from the cost of fuel and fuel-related costs
established in the electric public utility's previous general rate case on the basis of cost per
kilowatt hour.hour, provided that the Commission establishes a fuel cost and purchased power
cost sharing mechanism as provided in subsection (d3) of this section.
…
(c) For purposes ofAt least 30 days prior to the annual hearing, each electric public utility
shall submit to the Commission verified annualized information and data in such form and detail
as the Commission may require, for an historic 12-month test period, relating to:
(1) Cost of fuel and fuel-related costs used in each generating facility owned in
whole or in part by the utility.
(2) Fuel procurement practices and fuel inventories for each facility.facility,
including unredacted fuel supply agreements.
(3) Burned cost of fuel used in each generating facility.
(4) Plant capacity factor for each generating facility.
(5) Plant availability factor for each generating plant.
(6) Generation mix by types of fuel used.
(7) Sources and fuel cost component of purchased power used.
(8) Recipients of and revenues received for power sales and times of power sales.
(9) Test period kilowatt-hour sales for the utility's total system and on the total
system separated for North Carolina jurisdictional sales.
*H1192-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(10) Procurement practices and inventories for: fuel burned and for ammonia, lime,
limestone, urea, dibasic acid, sorbents, and catalysts consumed in reducing or
treating emissions.
(11) The cost incurred at each generating facility of fuel burned and of ammonia,
lime, limestone, urea, dibasic acid, sorbents, and catalysts consumed in
reducing or treating emissions.
(12) Any net gains or losses resulting from any sales by the electric public utility
of fuel or other fuel-related costs components.
(13) Any net gains or losses resulting from any sales by the electric public utility
of by-products produced in the generation process to the extent the costs of
the inputs leading to that by-product are costs of fuel or fuel-related costs.
(d) The Commission shall provide for notice of a public hearing with reasonable and
adequate time for investigation and for all intervenors to prepare for hearing. At the hearing the
Commission shall receive evidence from the utility, the Public Staff, and any intervenor desiring
to submit evidence, and from the public generally. In reaching its decision, the Commission shall
consider all evidence required under subsection (c) of this section as well as any and all other
competent evidence that may assist the Commission in reaching its decision including changes
in the cost of fuel consumed and fuel-related costs that occur within a reasonable time, as
determined by the Commission, after the test period is closed. The Subject to the cost sharing
mechanism provided in subsection (d3) of this section, the Commission shall incorporate in its
cost of fuel and fuel-related costs determination under this subsection the experienced
over-recovery or under-recovery of reasonable costs of fuel and fuel-related costs prudently
incurred by the electric public utility, based upon the prudent standards set pursuant to subsection
(d1) of this section, in fixing an increment or decrement rider. Upon request of the electric public
utility, the Commission shall also incorporate in this determination the experienced
over-recovery or under-recovery of costs of fuel and fuel-related costs through the date that is 30
calendar days prior to the date of the hearing, provided that the reasonableness and prudence of
these costs shall be subject to review in the utility's next annual hearing pursuant to this section.
The Commission shall use deferral accounting, and consecutive test historical 12-month periods,
in complying with this subsection, and the over-recovery or under-recovery portion of the
increment or decrement shall be reflected in rates for 12 months, notwithstanding any changes in
the base fuel cost in a general rate case. Any experienced over-recovery or under-recovery of
reasonable fuel and fuel-related costs prudently incurred shall accrue interest at the commercial
paper rate as identified by the Federal Reserve for A2/P2 nonfinancial issuers, or reasonable
successor thereto, on a weighted average basis over the applicable time period. The burden of
proof as to the correctness and reasonableness of the charge and as to whether the cost of fuel
and fuel-related costs were reasonably and prudently incurred shall be on the utility. The
Commission shall allow only that portion, if any, of a requested cost of fuel and fuel-related costs
adjustment that is based on adjusted and reasonable cost of fuel and fuel-related costs prudently
incurred under efficient management and economic operations. In evaluating whether cost of fuel
and fuel-related costs were reasonable and prudently incurred, the Commission shall apply the
rule adopted pursuant to subsection (d1) of this section. To the extent that the Commission
determines that an increment or decrement to the rates of the utility due to changes in the cost of
fuel and fuel-related costs over or under base fuel costs established in the preceding general rate
case is just and reasonable, the Commission shall order that the increment or decrement become
effective for all sales of electricity and remain in effect until changed in a subsequent general rate
case or annual proceeding under this section.
…
(d3) The Commission shall establish, by order or rule, a fuel cost and purchased power
cost sharing mechanism applicable to each electric public utility subject to this section. The
mechanism shall operate as follows:
Page 2 House Bill 1192-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Baseline. – The fuel cost and purchased power cost baseline for each annual
hearing shall be the total fuel and purchased power costs, on a per-kilowatt
hour basis, established in the electric public utility's most recent
Commission-approved fuel forecast and fuel factors.
(2) Variance Calculation. – At each annual hearing under subsection (b) of this
section, the Commission shall compare the electric public utility's actual fuel
and purchased power costs for the historic 12-month test period to the
baseline. The difference between actual costs and the baseline, whether an
over-expenditure or a savings, shall constitute the variance.
(3) Sharing Allocation. – Of the variance determined pursuant to subdivision (2)
of this subsection, eighty percent (80%) shall be recovered from or credited to
customers through the increment or decrement rider, and twenty percent
(20%) of the variance shall be recovered from or credited to the electric public
utility's shareholders. Where actual costs exceed the baseline, the utility's
shareholders shall absorb twenty percent (20%) of the variance and may not
recover that portion from customers. Where actual costs are below the
baseline, the utility's shareholders shall retain twenty percent (20%) of the
variance as a shareholder benefit, and eighty percent (80%) shall be credited
to customers through a reduction in the rider.
(4) Prudence Review. – The sharing allocation in subdivision (3) of this
subsection applies only to the portion of any variance that the Commission
finds was reasonably and prudently incurred. Any costs found to be
unreasonably or imprudently incurred shall be disallowed in full and may not
be recovered from customers. The twenty percent (20%) shareholder share
under subdivision (3) of this subsection is not a cap on disallowance. The
Commission retains full authority to disallow imprudently incurred costs
beyond that share.
(5) Annual True-Up. – The twenty percent (20%) shareholder share of any
over-expenditure variance shall be reflected as a reduction to the increment or
decrement rider in the annual hearing in which it is determined. The
Commission shall establish procedures for the accounting and reporting of
shareholder shares and customer credits under this subsection. The fuel cost
and purchased power cost sharing mechanism shall not be calculated on actual
over- and under-recovered amounts reported to the Commission pursuant to
subsection (d2) of this section.
…."

PART II. INDUSTRIAL ENERGY INDEPENDENCE
SECTION 2. The General Assembly finds that:
(1) North Carolina's electric public utilities project demand growth driven by
large commercial and industrial load additions at a rate that requires new tools
to manage grid costs, maintain reliability, and protect existing ratepayers.
(2) Large industrial and commercial customers who develop on-site electric
generation capacity reduce the volume of grid infrastructure that must be built
and paid for by all ratepayers.
SECTION 3.(a) Article 7 of Chapter 62 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 62-159.5. Bring Your Own Generation (BYOG) Program.
(a) Definitions. – For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(1) Bring Your Own Generation or BYOG. – An arrangement under which an
eligible large customer develops, owns, or contracts for on-site generation
House Bill 1192-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
capacity and connects that capacity to the electric grid for the purpose of
serving some or all of the customer's own load, and providing available
capacity as a grid service resource.
(2) BYOG interconnection agreement. – A standardized agreement governing the
technical and commercial terms under which an eligible large customer's
on-site generation capacity connects to the electric public utility's distribution
or transmission system.
(3) Eligible large customer. – An electric utility customer with a peak demand of
one megawatt (MW) or greater, or at some other level of peak demand as
defined by rule or order of the Commission.
(4) Grid service resource. – Any on-site generation capacity or controllable load
made available by an eligible large customer under a grid services agreement
to the electric public utility for dispatch, curtailment, or grid-balancing
purposes.
(5) Grid services agreement. – An agreement between an eligible large customer
and an electric public utility establishing the terms under which the customer's
grid service resources may be dispatched by the utility.
(6) On-site generation capacity. – An electric generating facility, including solar
photovoltaic systems, batter energy storage systems, fuel cells, combined heat
and power systems, or any combination thereof, located on or adjacent to an
eligible large customer's premises and used for the primary purpose of serving
that customer's electricity needs.
(b) Application. – Each electric public utility shall file with the Commission an
application requesting approval of a Bring Your Own Generation Program applicable to eligible
large customers. Each electric public utility's application shall provide standardized terms and
conditions for (i) an interconnection agreement with participating eligible large customers
connecting on-site generation capacity and (ii) a grid services agreement for participating eligible
large customers to offer grid service resources to the utility. The BYOG Program application
shall also include rates and interconnection fees applicable to eligible large customers, in addition
to a description of the cost allocation method used to establish rates under the program. Eligible
large customers who elect to participate in the voluntary BYOG Program may also elect to make
the customer's on-site generation capacity or controllable load available to the electric public
utility as a grid service resource under the terms of a grid services agreement.
(c) Rate Treatment for Participating Customers. – Each electric public utility shall file
for Commission approval rates for electric services applicable to eligible large customers
participating in the BYOG Program. The rates approved by the Commission shall:
(1) Reflect the reasonable costs attributable to serving eligible large load
customers, including the costs of interconnecting on-site generation capacity
and the costs of administering the Program.
(2) Reflect the benefits that on-site generation capacity and grid service resources
provide to the electric power system, including avoided transmission and
distribution infrastructure costs, avoided capacity costs, and the value of
dispatchable load flexibility during grid stress events.
(3) Not result in a net cost increase for residential and small commercial
customers.
(d) Interconnection Processing. – An electric public utility shall process applications
from eligible large customers to voluntary participate in the BYOG Program in accordance with
the following schedule:
(1) No later than 10 days following receipt of a BYOG application, the electric
public utility shall review the application for completeness and notify the
Page 4 House Bill 1192-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
applicant of receipt and whether any additional information is necessary for
the application to be considered complete.
(2) No later than 60 days following receipt of a complete BYOG application, the
electric public utility shall conduct a technical feasiibliity review and provide
the customer with a written feasibility determination.
(3) No later than 90 days following receipt of a complete BYOG application, the
electric public utility shall enter into a BYOG interconnection agreement with
the eligible large customer, except for good cause as demonstrated to the
Commission.
(4) No later than 180 days after entering a BYOG interconnection agreement, the
electric public utility shall complete the physical interconnection of the
eligible large customer's approved-on-site generation capacity, except for
good cause as demonstrated to the Commission.
(e) State Agency Coordination. – The Department of Commerce, in consultation with the
State Energy Office and the Department of Environmental Quality, shall develop the following:
(1) A single point-of-contact process through which eligible large customers
seeking to develop on-site generation capacity may coordinate with relevant
State agencies regarding applicable permits and approvals.
(2) A model permit checklist identifying all State-level permits, registrations, and
approvals that may be required for on-site generation capacity of different
technologies at different scales.
(f) Local Permitting. – Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any local
government development regulation that imposes a permit requirement applicable to the
construction of new on-site generation capacity shall be subject to the following:
(1) The permit application shall be available in an electronic format.
(2) As applicable to on-site generation capacity with a nameplate capacity equal
or less than five megawatts (MW), the local government shall issue a final
decision approving or denying the development permit within 30 business
days of receiving a complete application.
(3) As applicable to on-site generation capacity with a nameplate capacity greater
than five megawatts (MW), the local government shall issue a final decision
approving or denying the development permit within 60 business days of
receiving a complete application.
(4) The local government shall only apply such land use requirements for on-site
generation capacity that is reasonably related to public safety, building code
compliance, or compatibility with local land use plans.
(g) Electric Public Utility Report. – An electric public utility shall file with the
Commission no later than January 1 each year a report on the BYOG Program during the prior
year. The report shall include each of the following:
(1) The number of BYOG Program applications received, approved, denied, and
pending.
(2) The total nameplate capacity of all on-site generation capacity interconnected
under the BYOG Program, disaggregated by technology type.
(3) The number of grid services agreements entered between the electric public
utility and eligible large customers, the amount of aggregate capacity included
within those agreements, and the amount of energy dispatched under these
agreements.
(4) The total compensation paid to eligible large customers for grid service
resources provided to the electric public utility.
(5) An assessment of the impact of the BYOG Program on system peak demand,
avoided infrastructure costs, and ratepayer costs.
House Bill 1192-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(h) Commission Report; Program Review. – By no later than March 1 each year the
Commission shall submit to the General Assembly a summary of the reports filed by electric
public utilities as provided in subsection (g) of this section, along with any recommendations for
modifying the BYOG Program."
SECTION 3.(b) No later than 180 days after the effective date of this section, an
electric public utility shall submit the application as required by G.S. 62-159.5(b), as enacted by
subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 3.(c) No later than 180 days after the effective date of this section, the
Department of Commerce shall develop the single point-of-contact process and the model permit
checklist required under G.S. 62-159.5(e), as enacted by subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 3.(d) This section is effective when it becomes law.

PART III. APPROPRIATION AND EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 4.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the North Carolina
Housing Finance Agency the sum of thirty five million dollars ($35,000,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated to the Workforce Housing Loan Program.
SECTION 4.(b) This section becomes effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 5. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 6 House Bill 1192-First Edition